Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2110.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 453 of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is repealed:[Section 453. Expenditure of Public Funds for Abortions Limited.--Since it is the public policy of the Commonwealth to favor childbirth over abortion, no Commonwealth funds and no Federal funds which are appropriated by the Commonwealth shall be expended by any State or local government agency for the performance of abortion: Provided, That nothing in this act shall be construed to deny the use of funds where a physician has certified in writing that the life of the mother would be endangered if the fetus were carried to full term or except for such medical procedures necessary for the victims of rape or 12345678910111213141516171819 incest when such rape or incest has been reported promptly to a law enforcement agency or public health service. Nothing contained in this section shall be interpreted to restrict or limit in any way, appropriations, made by the Commonwealth or a local governmental agency to hospitals for their maintenance and operation, or, for reimbursement to hospitals for services rendered which are not for the performance of abortions.]Section 2. The provisions of 55 Pa. Code § 1163.62(a) are abrogated.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2110PN2729 - 2 - 12345678910